Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1419.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 318.4, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 318.4. A. Every operator doing business in this state


shall file a corporate surety bond, letter of credit from a banking


institution, cash, or a certificate of deposit with the Secretary of


State in the sum of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00)


conditioned upon compliance with Sections 318.2 through 318.9 of

Req. No. 3086 Page 1


this title for payment of any location damages and anticipated


reclamation obligations due which the operator cannot otherwise pay.


The Secretary of State shall hold such corporate surety bond, letter


of credit from a banking institution, cash, or certificate of


deposit for the benefit of the surface owners of this state and


shall ensure that such security is in a form readily payable to a


surface owner awarded damages in an action brought pursuant to this


act section. Each corporate surety bond, letter of credit, cash, or


certificate of deposit filed with the Secretary of State shall be


accompanied by a filing fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00).


B. The bonding company or banking institution shall file, for


such fee as is provided for by law, a certificate that said such


bond or letter of credit is in effect or has been canceled, or that


a claim has been made against it in the office of the court clerk in


each county in which the operator is drilling or planning to drill.


Said Such bond or letter of credit must remain in full force and


effect as long as the operator continues drilling operations in this


state. Each such filing shall be accompanied by a filing fee of Ten


Dollars ($10.00).


C. Upon deposit of the bond, letter of credit, cash, or


certificate of deposit, the operator shall be permitted entry upon


the property and shall be permitted to commence drilling of a well


or reworking operations in accordance with the terms and conditions


of any lease or other existing contractual or lawful right.

Req. No. 3086 Page 2


D. If the damages and reclamation obligations agreed to by the


parties or awarded by the court are greater than the bond, letter of


credit, cash, or certificate of deposit posted, the operator shall


pay the damages and reclamation obligations immediately or post an


additional bond, letter of credit, cash, or certificate of deposit


sufficient to cover the damages. Said Such increase in bond, letter


of credit, cash, or certificate of deposit shall comply with the


requirements of this section.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 52 O.S. 2021, Section 318.5, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 318.5. A. Prior to entering the site with heavy


equipment, the operator shall negotiate with the surface owner for


the payment of any damages and anticipated reclamation obligations


which may be caused by the drilling operation. If the parties


agree, and a written contract is signed, the operator may enter the


site to drill. If agreement is not reached, or if the operator is


not able to contact all parties, the operator shall petition the


district court in the county in which the drilling site is located


for appointment of appraisers to make recommendations to the parties


and to the court concerning the amount of damages and anticipated


reclamation obligations, if any. Once the operator has petitioned


for appointment of appraisers, the operator may enter the site to


drill.



Req. No. 3086 Page 3


B. Ten (10) days’ notice of the petition to appoint appraisers


shall be given to the opposite party, either by personal service or


by leaving a copy thereof at the party’s usual place of residence


with some family member over fifteen (15) years of age, or, in the


case of nonresidents, unknown heirs or other persons whose


whereabouts cannot be ascertained, by publication in one issue of a


newspaper qualified to publish legal notices in said the county, as


provided in Section 106 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes, said


such ten-day period to begin with the first publication.


C. The operator shall select one appraiser, the surface owner


shall select one appraiser, and the two selected appraisers shall


select a third appraiser for appointment by the court, which such


third appraiser shall be a state-certified general real estate


appraiser and be in good standing with the Oklahoma Real Estate


Appraisal Appraiser Board. Unless for good cause shown, additional


time is allowed by the district court, the three (3) appraisers


shall be selected within twenty (20) days of service of the notice


of the petition to appoint appraisers or within twenty (20) days of


the first date of publication of the notice as specified in


subsection B of this section. If either of the parties fails to


appoint an appraiser or if the two appraisers cannot agree on the


selection of the third appraiser within the required time period,


the remaining required appraisers shall be selected by the district


court upon application of either party of which at least one shall

Req. No. 3086 Page 4


be a state-certified general real estate appraiser and be in good


standing with the Oklahoma Real Estate Appraisal Appraiser Board.


Before entering upon their duties, such appraisers shall take and


subscribe an oath, before a notary public or some other person


authorized to administer oaths, that they will perform their duties


faithfully and impartially to the best of their ability. They shall


inspect the real property and consider the surface damages and


anticipated reclamation obligations which the owner has sustained or


will sustain by reason of entry upon the subject land and by reason


of drilling or maintenance of oil or gas production on the subject


tract of land. The appraisers shall then file a written report


within thirty (30) days of the date of their appointment with the


clerk of the court. The report shall set forth the quantity,


boundaries, and value of the property entered on or to be utilized


in said such oil or gas drilling, and the amount of surface damages


and reclamation done or to be done to the property. The appraisers


shall make a valuation and determine the amount of compensation to


be paid by the operator to the surface owner and the manner in which


the amount shall be paid. Said The appraisers shall then make a


report of their proceedings to the court. The compensation of the


appraisers shall be fixed and determined by the court. The operator


and the surface owner shall share equally in the payment of the


appraisers’ fees and court costs.



Req. No. 3086 Page 5


D. Within ten (10) days after the report of the appraisers is


filed, the clerk of the court shall forward to each attorney of


record, each party, and interested party of record, a copy of the


report of the appraisers and a notice stating the time limits for


filing an exception or a demand for jury trial as provided for in


this section. The operator shall provide the clerk of the court


with the names and last-known addresses of the parties to whom the


notice and report shall be mailed, sufficient copies of the notice


and report to be mailed, and pre-addressed, postage-paid envelopes.


1. This notice shall be on a form prepared by the


Administrative Director of the Courts, approved by the Oklahoma


Supreme Court, and supplied to all district court clerks.


2. If a party has been served by publication, the clerk shall


forward a copy of the report of the appraisers and the notice of


time limits for filing either an exception or a demand for jury


trial to the last-known mailing address of each party, if any, and


shall cause a copy of the notice of time limits to be published in


one issue of a newspaper qualified to publish legal notices as


provided in Section 106 of Title 25 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


3. After issuing the notice provided herein, the clerk shall


endorse on the notice form filed in the case the date that a copy of


the report and the notice form was forwarded to each attorney of


record, each party, and each interested party of record, or the date


the notice was published.

Req. No. 3086 Page 6


E. The time for filing an exception to the report or a demand


for jury trial shall be calculated as commencing from the date the


report of the appraisers is filed with the court. Upon failure of


the clerk to give notice within the time prescribed, the court, upon


application by any interested party, may extend the time for filing


an exception to the report or filing a demand for trial by jury for


a reasonable period of time not less than twenty (20) days from the


date the application is heard by the court. Appraisers’ Appraiser


fees and court costs may be the subject of an exception, may be


included in an action by the petitioner, and may be set and allowed


by the court.


F. The report of the appraisers may be reviewed by the court,


upon written exceptions filed with the court by either party within


thirty (30) days after the filing of the report. After the hearing


the court shall enter the appropriate order either by confirmation,


rejection, modification, or order of a new appraisal for good cause


shown. Provided, that in the event a new appraisal is ordered, the


operator shall have continuing right of entry subject to the


continuance of the bond required herein. Either party may, within


sixty (60) days after the filing of such report, file with the clerk


a written demand for a trial by jury, in which case the amount of


damages shall be assessed by a jury. The trial shall be conducted


and judgment entered in the same manner as railroad condemnation


actions tried in the court. A copy of the final judgment shall be

Req. No. 3086 Page 7


forwarded to the county assessor in the county or counties in which


the property is located. If the party demanding the jury trial does


not recover a more favorable verdict than the assessment award of


the appraisers, all court costs including reasonable attorney fees


shall be assessed against the party.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 318.11 of Title 52, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. In addition to all notices required by Section 318.3 of


Title 52 of the Oklahoma Statutes, an operator shall provide written


notice to the surface owner at least thirty (30) days before:


1. A transfer of operator;


2. Assignment of a lease or wellbore interest; or


3. Any transaction that changes control of a well, facility, or


associated equipment.


B. The notice shall include:


1. Names and addresses of the proposed successor;


2. A list of wells and facilities affected;


3. The date the transfer is proposed to be presented to the


Corporation Commission; and


4. A summary of due-diligence materials required pursuant to


Section 4 of this act.





Req. No. 3086 Page 8


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 318.12 of Title 52, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Upon written request, the operator or proposed successor


shall provide to the surface owner:


1. Mechanical integrity reports and well-status documentation;


2. Environmental assessments, spill reports, and inspection


results;


3. Plugging and site-restoration cost estimates;


4. Financial assurance instruments submitted to the Corporation


Commission; and


5. Any documents required pursuant to Corporation Commission


rules for transfer approval.


B. Documents shall be delivered in electronic or paper format


within ten (10) business days.


C. Failure to provide disclosures shall constitute a violation


of this act.


SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 318.13 of Title 52, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A surface owner has standing before the Corporation


Commission to request enforcement of this act.


B. A surface owner may file a petition alleging inadequate due


diligence, insufficient financial assurance, likelihood of

Req. No. 3086 Page 9


abandonment, violation of notice or disclosure requirements, or


regulatory noncompliance.


C. Upon petition, the Commission may stay or suspend a


transfer, require additional bonding, order inspections or


remediation, impose civil penalties, or deny or condition approval.


D. The Commission shall provide timely hearings and full


participation rights to surface owners.


SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 318.14 of Title 52, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Obligations pursuant to this act run with the well and bind


all successor operators.


B. Transfers that shift wells into undercapitalized or


nonoperational entities are presumed fraudulent and shall not


relieve the transferring operator of liability.


C. Successor operators are jointly and severally liable with


the transferor for violations involving inadequate due diligence,


false or misleading disclosures, insufficient financial assurance,


or lack of required approval or notice.


D. No operator may dissolve, withdraw, or terminate its


business entity in this state until certifying satisfaction of all


obligations pursuant to this act.





Req. No. 3086 Page 10


SECTION 7. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 318.15 of Title 52, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Before any hydraulic fracturing, acidizing, pressure


treatment, or reworking activity, the operator shall perform a


fracture-point or formation integrity test prior to any new


drilling, reworking, or stimulation activity to:


1. Determine the fracture initiation pressure of each zone at


which the formation will crack;


2. Determine safe pressure limits for the proposed treatment;


3. Confirm isolation of groundwater-bearing formations;


4. Determine operation risk on the groundwater, soil, or nearby


wells;


5. Prevent unintended fracture propagation;


6. Ensure casing, cement, and completion integrity; and


7. Ensure that the surface owner is fully informed of


activities affecting his or her property.


B. A report of results received from the test required pursuant


to subsection A of this section shall be filed no less than thirty


(30) days before any hydraulic fracturing or reworking begins under


oath with the Corporation Commission and shall also be provided to


the surface owner and all interest owners within the same time


frame. The report shall include the following:


1. Test results;

Req. No. 3086 Page 11


2. The maximum pressure that will be used;


3. Any risks identified during testing; and


4. Steps the operator will take to prevent damage.


C. If the test indicates a risk of fracture propagation into


freshwater zones, producing horizons, or abandoned wells, the


Commission shall conduct a hearing to consider the following


remedies:


1. Revised stimulation plans;


2. Lower pressure limits;


3. Stimulation prohibition; or


4. Additional casing or cement remediation.


D. Inadequate or false testing shall constitute grounds for the


Commission to enforce civil penalties, denial or revocation of an


operator’s permit, or joint and several liability pursuant to


Section 6 of this act.


E. If an operator fails to conduct the test or exceeds the


tested pressure limits, the surface owner may seek an injunction to


stop the operation and the operator shall be liable for any


resulting damages. The Commission may halt the operation, impose


penalties, or deny further permits.


F. A surface owner who asks for or uses the information from


the fracture-point test shall not be harassed, pressured, or


retaliated against by the operator. Any retaliation constitutes


actionable damages.

Req. No. 3086 Page 12


G. This section shall be liberally construed to protect surface


owners, water supplies, agricultural land, rural communities, and


responsible operators.


SECTION 8. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3086 CN 1/6/2026 9:33:59 AM





































Req. No. 3086 Page 13